North Dakota, session 69, HB1110.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 49-10.1-14 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
49-10.1-14. Commission may adopt and enforce safety rules - Investigation and surveillance
records - Railroads - Exempt.
1. The commission, for the protection of persons and property, may adopt and enforce railroad
safety rules not inconsistent with any federal agency having jurisdiction over railroads. The
commission may adopt rules more stringent than federal rules when necessary to eliminate an
essentially state or local safety hazard if the rules are not incompatible with any federal law or
rule and do not create an undue burden on interstate commerce.
2. A record and portion of a meeting related to the ongoing railroad investigation and surveillance
activities of the national transportation safety board and federal railroad administration state
safety participation program is an exempt record as defined under section 44 - 04 - 17.1 .

H. B. NO. 1110 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1110.
House Vote: Yeas 75 Nays 14 Absent 5
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 1 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State